Hawaii, session 2026, HB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's state and county employees are not adequately supported during times of birth, adoption, fostering a new child, or caregiving for a family member during illness. The legislature further finds that providing paid family leave to state and county employees could enhance recruitment and retention of quality employees, and fulfill the government's role as a model employer.  Research has shown that paid family leave reduces employment turnover, saving the cost of recruitment, hiring, and training, as well as increases the productivity of the workforce and employee morale.  Support by the employer for family care is often cited as a main attractor for young, highly educated workers when seeking employment, and must be seen as an investment in the state's and counties' success. The purpose of this Act is to establish paid family leave for all state and county employees that they can access when those employees need to provide care for a family member. SECTION 2.  Chapter 78, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§78-     Paid family leave.  (a)  Notwithstanding chapter 398, eligible employees shall be entitled to five days of paid leave each calendar year for family leave as described under section 398-3(a), which shall not be credited against an eligible employee's available accrued vacation or sick leave benefits. (b)  Paid leave under this section shall be paid at the eligible employee's regular rate of pay without loss of seniority, pay, vacation, sick leave, or earned accumulations. (c)  As used in this section, "eligible employee" means an employee who performs services for hire for not fewer than six consecutive months for the state or county from whom benefits are sought under this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________